Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604.125] DISPARAGEMENT OF PERISHABLE FOOD PRODUCTS. new text end new text begin (a) An individual who disparages a perishable food product with the intent to harm the reputation of the perishable food product producer and the producer suffers harm as a result is liable for damages if that individual knowingly makes false statements that: new text end new text begin (1) the perishable food product is not safe for human consumption; or new text end new text begin (2) the agricultural practices used to produce the perishable food product render that product not safe for human consumption. new text end new text begin (b) If the court finds that disparagement as described in paragraph (a) has occurred, the court may award general damages, special damages, or other relief that the court finds just and equitable. new text end new text begin (c) An action under this section must be commenced within one year of the date the cause of action arose. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this section, "agricultural practices" means the practices used in crop or livestock production, including but not limited to the use of fertilizers, tillage, and crop protection practices in crop production and the feeding, transporting, housing, and health practices in livestock production. new text end new text begin (e) For purposes of this section, "perishable food product" has the meaning given in section 34A.01, subdivision 9. new text end